Oklahoma, session 2025, SB303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2905, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2905. The provisions of Sections 2904 through 2911 of


this title shall apply only to persons sixty-five (65) years of age


or older; or to any totally disabled person, who is head of a


household, was a resident of and domiciled in this state during the


entire preceding calendar year, and whose gross household income


does not exceed the amount of Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00)


determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban


Development to be seventy-five percent (75%) of the estimated median

Req. No. 390 Page 1


income for the preceding year for the county or metropolitan


statistical area which includes the county for any calendar year;


and any person who has been honorably discharged from active service


in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or Oklahoma


National Guard and who has been certified by the United States


Department of Veterans Affairs to have a seventy-five percent (75%)


disability sustained through military action or accident, or


resulting from disease contracted while in the active service; any


person granted a disability retirement benefit by the Oklahoma


Police Pension and Retirement System, Oklahoma Firefighters Pension


and Retirement System, Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement System,


or the Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Department Retirement Fund for


a disability incurred in the line of duty; and a surviving spouse of


such person, who is the head of a household and a resident of and


domiciled in this state during the entire preceding calendar year.


The provisions of these sections shall be administered by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission, which shall devise and furnish appropriate


forms for claims, reports of household income, proof of property


taxes paid, and such other forms as may be deemed necessary to


support claims made pursuant to said sections.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2906, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2906. A. Any person sixty-five (65) years of age or


older or any totally disabled person, who is the head of a

Req. No. 390 Page 2


household, a resident of and domiciled in this state during the


entire preceding calendar year, and whose gross household income for


such year does not exceed Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) the


amount determined by the United States Department of Housing and


Urban Development to be seventy-five percent (75%) of the estimated


median income for the preceding year for the county or metropolitan


statistical area which includes the county may file a claim for


property tax relief on the amount of property taxes paid on the


household occupied by such person during the preceding calendar


year.


B. Any person who has been honorably discharged from active


service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or


Oklahoma National Guard and who has been certified by the United


States Department of Veterans Affairs to have a seventy-five percent


(75%) disability sustained through military action or accident, or


resulting from disease contracted while in the active service; any


person granted a disability retirement benefit by the Oklahoma


Police Pension and Retirement System, Oklahoma Firefighters Pension


and Retirement System, Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement System,


or the Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Department Retirement Fund for


a disability incurred in the line of duty; and a surviving spouse of


such person, who is the head of a household and a resident of and


domiciled in this state during the entire preceding calendar year


may file a claim for property tax relief on the amount of property

Req. No. 390 Page 3


taxes paid on the household occupied by the person during the


preceding calendar year.


C. Each head of household shall be allowed to file only one


claim per year.


D. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall provide information on the


income limitation provided in subsection A of this section to each


county assessor each year as soon as the information becomes


available.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2907, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2907. A. The amount of any claim filed pursuant to


Section 108 of this act 2908 of this title shall be for the amount


of the property taxes paid by the claimant for the preceding


calendar year which exceeds one percent (1%) of the household


income, but no claim for property tax relief shall exceed Two


Hundred Dollars ($200.00) One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).


B. The right to file a claim and to receive property tax relief


under the provisions of this act Sections 2904 through 2911 of this


title shall be personal to the claimant and shall not survive his or


her death, except that a surviving spouse of the claimant may


receive benefits hereunder upon the timely filing of a claim.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.




60-1-390 QD 12/30/2024 11:49:59 PM

Req. No. 390 Page 4